Utah statutes.
53-3-410 (Superseded 01/01/10).   Applicant information required for CDIP
and CDL -- State resident to have state CDL.
(1)  The application for a CDL or CDIP shall include the following information
regarding the applicant:
(a)  full legal name;
(b)  current mailing address;
(c)  Utah residential address, unless the application is for a temporary CDL
issued under Subsection 53-3-407(2)(b);
(d)  physical description, including sex, height, weight, and eye color;
(e)  date of birth;
(f)  Social Security number, unless the application is for a nonresident
license;
        (g)  a complete list of all states in which the applicant was issued a
driver license in the previous ten years; and
(h)  the applicant's signature.
(2)  An application under this section shall also include all certifications
required by 49 C.F.R., Part 383.71.
(3)  When the holder of a license under this part changes the holder's name,
mailing address, or residence, the holder shall make application for a
duplicate license within 30 days of the change.
(4)  A person who has been a resident of this state for 30 consecutive days
may not drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a commercial
driver license issued by another jurisdiction.
